Utah statutes.
76-10-1310.   Definitions.

(1)  "HIV infection" means an indication of Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV) infection determined by current medical standards and detected by any of the following:

(a)  presence of antibodies to HIV, verified by a positive confirmatory test, such as Western blot or other method approved by the Utah State Health Laboratory.  Western blot interpretation will be based on criteria currently recommended by the Association of State and Territorial Public Health Laboratory Directors;

(b)  presence of HIV antigen;

(c)  isolation of HIV; or

(d)  demonstration of HIV proviral DNA.

(2)  "HIV positive individual" means a person who is HIV positive and has actual knowledge of his disease.

(3)  "Local law enforcement agency" means the agency responsible for investigation of the violations of Sections 76-10-1302, 76-10-1303, and 76-10-1313, the filing of charges which may lead to conviction, and the conducting of tests for HIV infection.

(4)  "Notice" means the HIV positive individual has been notified by the law enforcement agency as provided in Section 76-10-1312.

(5)  "Positive" means an indication of the HIV infection as defined in Subsection (1).

(6)  "Test" or "testing" means a test or tests for HIV infection in accordance with standards recommended by the Department of Health.

